Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-720
Elective constitutional state officer; status; effect of bond; action to establish; notice; service upon Attorney General.

In such action the state hereby enters its voluntary appearance, and notice of hearing shall be served on the Attorney General within the time provided for service on other defendants in said proceedings.

Laws 1935, c. 187, § 4, p. 693;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 84-730;

R.S.1943, § 84-720.